Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 2. Nomination by Party Committee

§ 2381.
Applicability of subchapter.

A candidate may also be nominated and have the candidate’s name printed on the general election ballot in accordance with the provisions set forth in this subchapter, in the following instances:

In case of a vacancy on the general election ballot occasioned by death, removal, or withdrawal of a candidate, or the failure of a major political party to nominate a candidate by primary;

In case a minor political party desires to nominate a candidate for any office for which major political parties nominate candidates by primary or for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States;

In case of nomination for the office of justice of the peace, in the event that such nomination has not already been made by caucus as provided in section 2413 of this chapter.

In no event may any committee nominate a candidate or candidates for statewide office under this subchapter unless the political party has town committees organized in at least 10 towns in this State in accordance with procedures in chapter 45 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2015, No. 30

, § 5, eff. May 26, 2015;

2017, No. 50

, § 14.

§ 2382.
Which committee to nominate.

Nominations of party candidates pursuant to this subchapter shall be made by the following political committee of the party:

By the State committee in the case of President and Vice President of the United States or State or congressional officers;

By the county committee in the case of county officers;

By the senatorial district committee in the case of the office of State Senator;

By the representative district committee in the case of the office of Representative to the General Assembly;

By the town committee in the case of the office of justice of the peace.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 15.

§ 2383.
Notice of meetings.

The chair of the appropriate committee, or if the chair has not called a meeting then any three members of the committee, may set a date, time, and place for a committee meeting for the nomination of candidates pursuant to this subchapter and shall give not less than five days’ notice in writing to all members of the committee.
The notice shall specifically state the offices for which nominations may be made.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2384.
Procedure upon meeting.

At the time and place set for the meeting, the committee shall proceed to nominate such candidates as it may desire pursuant to this subchapter.
Nomination shall require a majority of those present and voting, and if no candidate shall have received a majority after two ballots, the candidate with the lowest number of votes in the second and in each succeeding ballot shall be eliminated until a candidate receives a majority.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2385.
Statement by committee officers; consent of candidate.

When a nomination is made under the provisions of this subchapter, the chair and the secretary of the committee making the nomination shall file a statement of nomination in substantially the following form:

Click to view

(e)

In the case of nominations by town committee or caucus for the office of justice of the peace, before filing the statement of nomination the chair, acting chair, secretary, or acting secretary shall check with each nominee and confirm that he or she consents to have his or her name printed on the ballot as a candidate for that position and to serve if elected.

“The met on and nominated the =font8 (name of committee) (date) following person (or persons) to be a candidate (or candidates) of the for the office (or offices) indicated =font8 (Name of political party) =font8 (Name of candidate)
(residence)
(office for which nominated) “Notice of the meeting was properly given in compliance with all requirements of section 2383 of this title and the procedures required by section 2384 of this title were followed. A copy of the notice of the meeting is attached. “We swear under oath that we understand the above provisions of law and that the statements we have made in this document are true. Sworn to before me =font8 Notary Public Signature of Chair ” =font8 Date Signature of Secretary (b) The statement of nomination shall be signed by the chair or acting chair and secretary or acting secretary of the committee making the nomination. They shall swear in their statement of nomination that the notice requirements of section 2383 of this title and procedural requirements of section 2384 of this title were complied with and that the persons listed as candidates were nominated at the meeting. (c) A copy of the notice that was sent to all committee members pursuant to section 2383 of this title shall be filed along with the statement of nomination. (d) Except in the case of nominations for justice of the peace, the candidate named in the statement shall file a consent to having the candidate’s name printed on the ballot, similar in form to the consent required in section 2361 of this title before the last day for filing statements of nomination. It shall be sufficient for meeting this requirement if the candidate signs the statement of nomination with a statement in substantially the following form: “I consent to having my name printed on the general election ballot for the office of . =font8
(office for which nomination was made) My name (as I wish it to appear on the ballot), town or city of residence, and party are as follows: =font8
Name (please print)
Town of residence (please print) Party (please print)
Date
Signature of Candidate
”
Mailing Address

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

1985, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2386.
Time for filing statements.

In the case of the failure of a major political party to nominate a candidate by primary, a statement shall be filed not later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixth day following the primary.

In the case of the death or withdrawal of a candidate after the primary election, the party committee shall have seven days from the date of the death or withdrawal to nominate a candidate. In no event shall a statement be filed later than 60 days prior to the general election.

In the case of a nomination by a minor political party, a statement shall be filed not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the Thursday preceding the primary election described in section 2351 of this chapter and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the third day prior to the day of a special primary election.
(c) (1) In the case of a nomination by a minor political party, a statement shall be filed not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the Thursday preceding the primary election described in section 2351 of this chapter and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the third day prior to the day of a special primary election.

A statement shall apply only to the election cycle in which the statement is filed.

In the case of a nomination for the office of justice of the peace, a statement shall be filed as set forth in section 2413 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

1985, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2001, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 59

, § 13;

2009, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 7, 2010;

2009, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 10, 2010;

2015, No. 30

, § 6, eff. May 26, 2015;

2017, No. 50

, § 16.

§ 2387.
Place for filing statements.

Statements for the office of justice of the peace shall be filed with the town clerk.
All other statements and consents shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.